Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
AMENDMENT OF BYLAWS

7-130-201. Amendment of bylaws by board of directors or members.

The board of directors may amend the bylaws at any time to add, change, or delete a provision, unless:

Articles 121 to 137 of this title or the articles of incorporation reserve such power exclusively to the members in whole or part; or

A particular bylaw expressly prohibits the board of directors from doing so; or

It would result in a change of the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of a membership class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of another class.

The members may amend the bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended by the board of directors. In such instance, the action shall be taken in accordance with sections 7-130-103 and 7-130-104 as if each reference therein to the articles of incorporation was a reference to the bylaws.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 711, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 626, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 249, § 53, effective May 29.

7-130-202. Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for members.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 626, § 36, effective July 1, 1998.)

A bylaw that fixes a lesser or greater quorum requirement or a greater voting requirement for members pursuant to section 7-127-207 shall not be amended by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 626, § 36, effective July 1.

7-130-203. Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended:

If adopted by the members, only by the members; or

If adopted by the board of directors, either by the members or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the members that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended only by a stated vote of either the members or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section to adopt or amend a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2344, § 316, effective July 1, 2004.